Hawaii statutes.
§660-29 Discharge, when. If no legal
cause for the imprisonment or restraint is shown the person shall be
immediately discharged therefrom. [L 1870, c 32, §21; RL 1925, §2752; RL 1935,
§4337; RL 1945, §10378; RL 1955, §239-29; HRS §660-29]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next